Mississippi, session 2026, HB4002.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Board of Supervisors of Forrest County, Mississippi, to assist in paying costs associated with making critical emergency-staging upgrades at The Center at Forrest County to enhance the center's capabilities to serve as a centralized emergency staging site, as described in Section 2 of this act, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.................... $ 2,000,000.00 SECTION 2.  The funds appropriated by Section 1 of this act shall be used for making infrastructure enhancements, installation of a dedicated communication center, creation of additional storage space, and making enhancements to ensure compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.